Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 2 S HORE PROTECTION
12-5-239. Completion of permit; notice of proposed activity; requirements and restrictions regarding issuance of permit.

The committee shall take action on each permit application within 90 days after the application is completed; provided, however, that this provision may be waived upon the written request of the applicant. An application is complete when it contains substantially all of the written information, documents, forms, fees, and materials required by this part. An application must be completed sufficiently in advance of the committee meeting at which the project will be considered to allow for public notice and evaluation by the committee.

After receipt of a completed application and at least 15 days prior to acting on the application, the committee shall notify all persons identified by the applicant as owning land adjacent to the location of the proposed project and to all persons who have filed a written request with the committee that their names be placed on a mailing list for receipt of such notice. Any person desiring to be placed on such mailing list must so request in writing and renew such request in December of each year. The name of any person who has not renewed such request shall be removed from the list. The landowners who have not requested to be placed on a mailing list shall be notified in writing if their addresses are known. Such notice shall be in writing and shall include a general description of the proposed project and its location. The applicant shall post such notice in a conspicuous place on the subject property at or prior to the time the committee issues public notice of the application. If the applicant has filed an affidavit that the names or addresses of the adjoining landowners were not ascertained after a diligent search, the committee shall cause a notice of the proposed activity and a brief description of the land to be affected to be published in the legal organ or a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which such land lies. Cost of such public notices shall be paid by the applicant. Whenever there appears to be sufficient public interest, the committee may call a public hearing.

No permit shall be issued except in accordance with the following provisions:

A permit for a structure or land alteration, including, but not limited to, private residences, motels, hotels, condominiums, and other commercial structures, in the dynamic dune field may be issued only when:

The proposed project shall occupy the landward area of the subject parcel and, if feasible, the area landward of the sand dunes;

At least a reasonable percentage, not less than one-third, of the subject parcel shall be retained in its naturally vegetated and topographical condition;

The proposed project is designed according to applicable hurricane-resistant standards;

The activities associated with the construction of the proposed project are kept to a minimum, are temporary in nature, and, upon project completion, restore the natural topography and vegetation to at least its former condition, using the best available technology; and

The proposed project will maintain the normal functions of the sand-sharing mechanisms in minimizing storm-wave damage and erosion, both to the unaltered section of the subject parcel and at other shoreline locations;

No permits shall be issued for a structure on beaches, eroding sand dune areas, and submerged lands; provided, however, that a permit for a pier, boardwalk, or crosswalk in such an area may be issued, provided that:

The activities associated with the construction of the proposed land alterations are kept to a minimum, are temporary in nature, and, upon project completion, the natural topography and vegetation shall be restored to at least their former condition, using the best available technology; and

The proposed project maintains the normal functions of the sand-sharing mechanisms in minimizing storm-wave damage and erosion, both to the unaltered section of the subject parcel and at other shoreline locations;

A permit for shoreline engineering activity or for a land alteration on beaches, sand dunes, and submerged lands may be issued only when:

The activities associated with the construction of the proposed project are to be temporary in nature, and the completed project will result in complete restoration of any beaches, dunes, or shoreline areas altered as a result of that activity;

The proposed project will insofar as possible minimize effects to the sand-sharing mechanisms from storm-wave damage and erosion both to the subject parcel and at other shoreline locations;

In the event that shoreline stabilization is necessary, either low-sloping porous rock structures or other techniques which maximize the dissipation of wave energy and minimize shoreline erosion shall be used. Permits may be granted for shoreline stabilization activities when the applicant has demonstrated that no reasonable or viable alternative exists; provided, however, that beach restoration and renourishment techniques are preferable to the construction of shoreline stabilization activities; and

A copy of the permit application has been transmitted to the local unit of government wherein the project site lies, if such local unit of government has been certified by the board, requesting comments on such application.

In evaluating a permit application in order to determine compliance with the provisions set forth in subsection (c) of this Code section, the committee may use the following assessment tools and techniques, as appropriate and as available:

Historic photographs and topographic data of the project site, which can be used in determining the impact of a proposed project on the stability of the shoreline;

On-site inspections to determine the impact of a proposed project on topographic and vegetative conditions, erosion or accretion rates, and other factors influencing the life cycles of dune plants;

Any recognized or accepted scientific investigations necessary to determine the proposed project's impacts on the surrounding biological and geological systems, and the historic and archeological resources;

When present, the potential effects of shoreline engineering structures (seawalls, groins, jetties, etc.), their condition, and their apparent influence on the sand-sharing system as it relates to the proposed project;

Historic, climatological, tidal data, and meteorological records of the vicinity of the project and possible potential effects of a proposed project upon erosion and accretion rates; and

New scientific information which, through recent advances, would effect a more competent decision relative to wise use and management of Georgia's sand-sharing system.

Every permit shall require that the proposed project be completed within five years after the date of issuance of the permit and shall expire five years after the date of issuance. Such time may be extended five additional years upon a showing that all due efforts and diligence toward the completion of the project have been made. If the holder of an unexpired permit sells, leases, rents, or otherwise conveys the land or any portion of the land for which the permit was issued, such permit shall be continued in force in favor of the new owner, lessee, tenant, or other assignee so long as there is no change in the use of the land as set forth in the original application. The new owner must notify the committee within 30 days after change of ownership of the land or any portion thereof.

All plans, documents, and materials contained in any application for any permit required by this part shall be made a part of the permit, if granted, and conformance to such plans, documents, and materials shall be a condition of the permit. No change or deviation from any such plans, documents, or materials shall be permitted without the prior notification and approval of the committee.

Compliance with all other federal, state, and local statutes, ordinances, and regulations shall also be a condition of every permit issued pursuant to this part. If, prior to completion of review of an application under this part the committee receives notice of the denial of a permit or authorization necessary for the project, review of the project shall be suspended and, if the denial becomes final, the application shall stand denied.

All permit-issuing authorities may place such conditions on any permit issued under this Code section as are necessary to carry out this part.

In passing upon the application for a permit, the committee shall consider the public interest which for purposes of this part shall be deemed to be the following considerations:

Whether or not unreasonably harmful, increased alteration of the dynamic dune field or submerged lands, or function of the sand-sharing system will be created;

Whether or not the granting of a permit and the completion of the applicant's proposal will unreasonably interfere with the conservation of marine life, wildlife, or other resources; and

Whether or not the granting of a permit and the completion of the applicant's proposal will unreasonably interfere with reasonable access by and recreational use and enjoyment of public properties impacted by the project.

Issuance of a permit under this part and construction of the permitted project shall not remove the designated property from the jurisdiction of this part. All changes in permitted uses which increase impacts to any land subject to the provisions of this part must be ruled upon by the committee to determine if the proposed change is consistent with this part and the permit. Each permitted alteration within the area of operation of this part shall be reviewed by the committee on a five-year basis or when noncompliance with the purpose for which the permit was issued is evident to determine if the use within the area of operation of this part is consistent with the intent of this part. If the permit holder is found not to be in compliance with this part, the committee shall take action as authorized under Code Section 12-5-247.

A permit granted by the committee becomes final immediately upon issuance, but no construction or alteration may commence until the expiration of 30 days following the date of the committee meeting at which the application is approved, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection; provided, however, that if a timely appeal is filed, no construction or alteration may commence until all administrative proceedings are terminated except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection.

If the committee, either at the request of the applicant or on its own motion, finds that an emergency exists in any particular geographic area or in regard to any particular permit issued by the committee, the committee is authorized to allow a permittee to commence immediately or to continue the construction or alteration authorized by the permit. The committee in determining an emergency shall base its determination on imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare or a grave danger to life, real property, structures, or shoreline engineering activities. If the committee makes such a finding of an emergency, the permittee may commence immediately or continue the construction or alteration authorized by the permit, but such construction or alteration is undertaken at the risk to the permittee of an administrative or judicial order requiring the sand dunes, beaches, and submerged lands to be returned to their condition prior to such construction or alteration.

When work has been completed in accordance with provisions of a permit, the permittee shall so notify the committee in writing within 30 days of such completion.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-239

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 493, § 5/HB 445.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 3, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and for all other purposes effective December 30, 2019, substituted "committee" for "permit-issuing authority" throughout this Code section; in the first sentence of subsection (b), substituted "15 days" for "30 days" and substituted "the committee" for "such permit-issuing authority" in the middle; in subsection (e), substituted "the holder of an unexpired permit" for "a permit holder" near the beginning of the third sentence, and, in the fourth sentence, substituted "new owner must notify the committee within 30 days after change of ownership of the land or any portion thereof" for "permittee must notify the permit-issuing authority within 30 days after change of ownership of property".

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, a comma was inserted following the second occurrence of "issued" in paragraph (c)(2).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2019, p. 493,

§

10/HB 445, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval for the purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and shall become effective on December 31, 2019, for all other purposes." The Act was approved by the Governor on May 3, 2019.

12-5-240. Posting of permit.

A copy of every permit issued to an applicant shall be prominently displayed within the area of proposed activity. If the committee deems it advisable, the applicant may be required to cause a sign to be erected bearing the permit number, date of issuance, name of applicant, and such other information as the committee may reasonably require. The committee may specify the type of and, within reasonable dimensions, the size of the sign.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-240

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 493, § 6/HB 445.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 3, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and for all other purposes effective December 30, 2019, substituted "committee" for "permit-issuing authority" throughout this Code section.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2019, p. 493,

§

10/HB 445, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval for the purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and shall become effective on December 31, 2019, for all other purposes." The Act was approved by the Governor on May 3, 2019.

12-5-241. Local shore assistance programs.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 2-3/HB 252, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor's notes.

- This Code section was based on Code 1981,

§

12-5-241

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362,

§

1.

12-5-242. Technical assistance to local governments; model ordinance.

The department shall provide technical assistance to any local unit of government which requests such assistance in order to develop an ordinance meeting the requirements of this part. The department shall also develop a model ordinance which may be used by such local units of government.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-242

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1.)

12-5-243. Local governments not prohibited from adopting more restrictive ordinances.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as prohibiting a local unit of government from adopting ordinances more restrictive in regard to activity on sand dunes and beaches than the standards set forth in this part.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-243

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1.)

12-5-244. Administrative and judicial review.

Any person who is aggrieved or adversely affected by any order or action of the committee shall, upon petition within 30 days after the issuance of such order or taking of such action, have a right to a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the board. The hearing before the administrative law judge shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act," and the rules and regulations adopted by the board pursuant thereto. The decision of the administrative law judge shall constitute the final decision of the board and any party to the hearing, including the committee, shall have the right of judicial review thereof in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50.

Persons are "aggrieved or adversely affected" where the challenged action has caused or will cause them injury in fact and where the injury is to an interest within the zone of interests to be protected or regulated by this part. In the event the committee or local unit of government, as appropriate, asserts in response to the petition before the administrative law judge that the petitioner is not aggrieved or adversely affected, the administrative law judge shall take evidence and hear arguments on this issue and thereafter make a ruling on this issue before continuing with the hearing. The burden of going forward with evidence on this issue shall rest with the petitioner.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-244

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 493, § 7/HB 445.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 3, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and for all other purposes effective December 30, 2019, deleted former subsection (b), which read: "Where a local unit of government has, pursuant to this part, granted, suspended, modified, extended, conditioned, or denied a permit, any person aggrieved or adversely affected by such action shall be afforded a right to administrative and judicial review of such action."; and redesignated former subsection (b) as present subsection (c).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2019, p. 493,

§

10/HB 445, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval for the purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and shall become effective on December 31, 2019, for all other purposes." This Act was approved by the Governor on May 3, 2019.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Procedures for disposition of contested cases, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-1-2.

12-5-245. Injunctive relief.

Any activity in violation of this part or of any ordinance or regulation adopted pursuant to this part shall be a public nuisance; and such activity may be enjoined or abated by an action filed in the appropriate superior court by the Attorney General on behalf of the department, by any local unit of government affected, or by any person. Upon showing of any activity in violation of this part or of any ordinance or regulation adopted pursuant to this part, a temporary restraining order, a permanent or temporary injunction, or other order shall be granted without the necessity of showing lack of an adequate remedy at law and irreparable injury. The relief granted by the court in an action filed pursuant to this Code section may include, but shall not be limited to, an order requiring the sand dunes, beaches, and submerged lands to be returned to their condition prior to such violation.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-245

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1.)

12-5-246. Jurisdiction of superior court.

The superior court of the county in which the land or any part thereof is located or in which jurisdiction is otherwise proper shall have jurisdiction to restrain a violation of this part at the action of any person.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-246

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1.)

12-5-247. Enforcement of part; civil penalty.

If the department determines that any person is violating any provision of this part or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this part or the terms and conditions of any permit issued under this part, the department may employ any combination of the following:

The department may issue an administrative order specifying the provision of this part or the rule, or both, alleged to have been violated and require the person so ordered to cease and desist from such activity and to take corrective action within a reasonable period of time as prescribed in the order; provided, however, that the issuance of such order shall not affect the availability of relief under Code Section 12-5-244. Such corrective action may include, but shall not be limited to, requiring that the sand dunes, beaches, and submerged lands be returned to their condition prior to the violation of this part or a rule adopted pursuant to this part. Any such order shall become final unless the person named therein requests in writing a hearing before a hearing officer appointed by the board no later than ten days after the issuance of such order. Review of such order shall be available as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 12-5-244;

Whenever the committee finds that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the public or private interest where the public interest is served, it may issue an order reciting the existence of such an emergency and requiring or allowing that such action be taken as it deems necessary to meet the emergency. Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, such order shall be effective immediately. If an order requiring a person to take action is issued pursuant to this paragraph, such person shall be entitled to a hearing within ten days of the date of issuance of the order. Any person who is aggrieved or adversely affected by an emergency order of the committee, upon petition within ten days after issuance of such order, shall have a right to a hearing before an administrative law judge appointed by the board. The committee shall hold a meeting no sooner than 30 days after the issuance of an emergency order to review such order to determine whether the order has been complied with, whether the order should continue in force, and any possible effects of such order on the sand-sharing system;

The committee may file in the appropriate superior court a certified copy of an unappealed final order of the administrative law judge or of a final order of the administrative law judge affirmed upon appeal or other orders of the committee, whereupon the court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereof shall thereafter be the same, as though such judgment has been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by the court; and

The department may seek injunctive relief pursuant to Code Section 12-5-245.

Any person who violates any provision of this part or any rule or regulation adopted under this part, any permit issued under this part, or final or emergency order of the department shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000.00 for each act of violation. Each day of continued violation shall subject such person to a separate civil penalty. An administrative law judge appointed by the board after a hearing conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act," shall determine whether or not any person has violated any provision of this part, any rule or regulation adopted under this part, any permit, or any final or emergency order of the department or committee and shall upon proper finding issue an order imposing such civil penalties as provided in this subsection. Review of such order shall be available as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 12-5-244. All civil penalties recovered by the department as provided in this subsection shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund.

Any person who causes or permits any removal, filling, or other alteration of the dynamic dune field or submerged lands in this state without first obtaining a permit from the committee shall be liable in damages to the state and any political subdivision of the state for any and all actual or projected costs and expenses and injuries occasioned by such alteration of the dynamic dune field or submerged lands. The amount of damages assessed pursuant to this Code section shall include, but shall not be limited to, any actual or projected costs and expenses incurred or to be incurred by the state or any political subdivision thereof in restoring as nearly as possible the natural topography of the sand-sharing system and replacing the vegetation destroyed by any alteration of the dynamic dune field or submerged lands. Damages to the state shall be recoverable in a civil action instituted by the department and shall be paid to the department to cover cost of restoration. Damages to a political subdivision shall be recoverable in a civil action instituted by such subdivision.

Owners of property with knowledge of unauthorized activities occurring thereon are responsible under this part.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-247

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 493, § 8/HB 445.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 3, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and for all other purposes effective December 30, 2019, substituted the present provisions of subsection (a) for the former provisions, which read: "If the department determines that any person is violating any provision of this part or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this part or the terms and conditions of any permit issued under this part, and such violation is in an area where the committee is the permit-issuing authority, the department may employ any one, or any combination of any or all, of the enforcement methods specified in paragraphs (1) through (4) of this subsection:"; substituted "such" for "said" in the second sentence of subsection (b) and near the end of the last sentence of subsection (c); and substituted "committee" for "permit-issuing authority" in the third sentence of subsection (b) and in the first sentence of subsection (c).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2019, p. 493,

§

10/HB 445, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval for the purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and shall become effective on December 31, 2019, for all other purposes." The Act was approved by the Governor on May 3, 2019.

12-5-248. Criminal violations.

It shall be unlawful for any person to:

Operate any motorized vehicle or other motorized machine on, over, or across sand dunes or beaches except as authorized by the department or committee, except that individual disability vehicles, emergency vehicles, and governmental vehicles utilized for beach maintenance or research may operate within sand dunes and beaches without authorization from the department or committee so long as those vehicles operate across existing cross-overs, paths, or drives; or

Store or park sailboats, catamarans, or other commercial or recreational marine craft on any sand dune.

All such lawful activities conducted under this part shall provide protection to nesting sea turtles and their hatchlings and habitats and to nesting shore birds and their hatchlings and habitats.

Any person violating the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-248

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 13; Ga. L. 2002, p. 521, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 493, § 9/HB 445.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 3, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and for all other purposes effective December 30, 2019, in paragraph (a)(1), substituted "department or committee" for "permit-issuing authority" near the middle, and substituted "department or committee so" for "permit-issuing authority as" near the end.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2019, p. 493,

§

10/HB 445, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval for the purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and shall become effective on December 31, 2019, for all other purposes." The Act was approved by the Governor on May 3, 2019.